Wisconsin, session 2025, SB234.
do enact as follows:SB234,13Section 1. 118.07 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB234,2,44118.07 (6) A school board, the operator of a charter school under s. 118.40 (2r) 5or (2x), or the governing body of a private school participating in a program under s. 1115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 shall post in a conspicuous location in a public area of 2each school building a sign that contains the telephone number for the local agency, 3as defined in s. 48.981 (1) (ag), that is responsible for receiving reports of, and 4conducting investigations regarding, child abuse and neglect under s. 48.981.SB234,2,55